en: Incorrect product type
ar: نوع المنتج غير صحيح
bg: Неправилен тип продукт
ca: Tipus de producte incorrecte
cs: Nesprávný typ produktu
da: Forkert produkttype
de: Falscher Produkttyp
el: Εσφαλμένος τύπος προϊόντος
es: Tipo de producto incorrecto
et: Vale tootetüüp
fi: Väärä tuotetyyppi
fr: Type de produit incorrect
he: סอย מוצר שגוי
hi: अमान्य उत्पाद प्रकार
hr: Pogrešna vrsta proizvoda
hu: Hibás terméktípus
id: Tipe produk salah
it: Tipo di prodotto errato
ja: 不正な製品タイプ
ko: 잘못된 제품 유형
lt: Neteisingas produkto tipas
lv: Nepareizs produkta veids
ms: Jenis produk salah
nl: Verkeerd producttype
no: Feil produkttype
pl: Nieprawidłowy typ produktu
pt: Tipo de produto incorreto
ro: Tip de produs incorect
ru: Неправильный тип продукта
sk: Nesprávny typ produktu
sl: Napačna vrsta izdelka
sv: Fel produkttyp
th: ประเภทสินค้าไม่ถูกต้อง
tr: Yanlış ürün tipi
uk: Неправильний тип продукту
vi: Sai loại sản phẩm
zh: 错误产品类型

en: Non food products
bg: Нехранителни продукти
ca: Productes no alimentaris
de: Non-Food-Produkte, Non Food Produkte
es: Productos no alimenticios
fi: ei ruokatuote
fr: Non alimentaire
hr: Neprehrambeni proizvodi
hu: Nem élelmiszer
it: Prodotti non alimentari
nl: Non-food
pt: Produtos não alimentares
ru: Непищевые продукты, Не еда

en: Open Beauty Facts, OBF, Cosmetics, Hygiene
xx: Open Beauty Facts, OBF
pt: Open Beauty Facts, obf, cosméticos, higiene

en: Open Pet Food Facts, OPFF, pet food
xx: Open Pet Food Facts, OPFF, pet food
pt: Open Pet Food Facts, opff, alimentos para animais de estimação

en: Open Products Facts, OPF
xx: Open Products Facts, OPF
pt: Open Products Facts, opf

en: kitchenware
nl: Keukenproducten, Keukenbenodigdheden
pt: Utensílios de cozinha

en: books
bg: книги
da: bøger, bog
de: Bücher
fr: livres
hr: knjige, knjiga
ja: 本
nl: Boeken
pt: Livros
sv: böcker, bok

en: detergents
hr: deterdženti, deterdžent
ja: 洗剤
nl: Detergenten
pt: Detergentes
tr: Deterjan

en: Cigarettes
bg: Цигари
de: Zigaretten
fi: savukkeet
fr: cigarettes
hr: cigarete, cigareta
hu: cigaretta, cigi
it: Biscotti a sigaretta
ja: タバコ, 煙草
pl: Papierosy
pt: Cigarros
ru: Сигареты
tr: Sigara

en: Artisan products
ca: Prouctes artesans
de: Handgefertigte Produkte, Artisanale Produkte, Handgemachte Produkte
es: Productos artesanales, Productos artesanos
fi: Artesaanituotteet
fr: Produits artisanaux
hr: Obrtnički proizvodi
hu: Kézműves termékek
it: Prodotti artigianali
lt: Amatininkų gaminiai
nl: Ambachtelijke producten, Ambachtelijk product, Ambachtelijk produkt
pt: Produtos caseiras
ro: Produse artizanale
zh: 手工制品

en: Handmade breadsticks
ca: Bastonets de pa artesans
de: Handgefertigte Brotstangen, Handgemachte Brotstangen
es: Palitos de pan artesanales
fi: käsintehdyt leipätikut
fr: Gressins artisanaux
hr: Ručno rađeni grisini
hu: Kézműves kenyérrudacskák, Kézzel készült kenyérrudacskák
it: Grissini artigianali, Grissini fatti a mano
nl: Handgemaakte broodstengels
pt: Pãozinhos artesanais
ro: Grisine artizanale

en: Pasteurised products
bg: Патьоризирани продукти
da: Pasteuriserede produkter
de: Pasteurisierte Produkte
es: Productos pasteurizados
fr: Produits pasteurisés
hu: Pasztőrözött termékek
it: Prodotti pastorizzati
nl: Gepasteuriseerde producten
pl: Produkty pasteryzowane
pt: Produtos pasteurizados
sv: Pastöriserade produkter
zh: 低温杀菌产品

en: Unpasteurised products
bg: Непатьоризирани продукти
da: Upasteuriserede produkter
de: Nicht pasteurisierte Produkte
es: Productos no pasteurizados
fr: Produits non pasteurisés
hu: Pasztörizálatlan termékek
it: Prodotti non pastorizzati
nl: Ongepasteuriseerde producten
pl: Produkty niepasteryzowane
pt: Produtos não pasteurizados
sv: Opastöriserade produkter
zh: 未低温杀菌产品

en: Baby foods
bg: Бебешки храни
ca: Alimentació per a nadons
da: Babymad
de: Babynahrung, Säuglingsnahrung
es: Alimentos infantiles, Alimentos para bebés, Alimentos para lactantes, Alimentos para niños de corta edad, Alimentación infantil
fi: Vauvanruoat
fr: Aliments pour bébé, aliment pour bébé, alimentation pour bébé, aliment bébé, alimentation bébé, aliments bébé, alimentation infantile
he: מזון תינוקות
hr: Dječja hrana
hu: Bébiételek, Babaételek
it: Alimenti per bambini, Alimenti per neonati
ko: 이유식
lt: Vaikų maistas, vaikų maistelis, kūdikių maistas
nl: Babyvoeding
pl: Żywność dla niemowląt
pt: alimento para bebés
ro: Mâncare pentru bebeluși
rs: Dečija hrana, Hrana za bebe
ru: Детское питание
th: อาหารเด็กอ่อน
tr: Mama, Bebek maması
zh: 婴儿食品

en: Cereals for babies
ca: Cereals infantils
de: Zerealien für Babies, Cerealien für Babies
es: Cereales para bebes
fi: aamiaismuroja vauvoille
fr: Céréales pour bébé, céréales bébé, céréales infantiles
hr: Žitarice za bebe
hu: Gabonafélék csecsemőknek, Gabonafélék babáknak
it: Cereali per neonati, Cereali per bambini
lt: Vaikiškos košės, Kūdikių košės
nl: Baby ontbijtpappen, Baby ontbijtpap
pt: Cereais para bebé
ro: Cereale pentru bebeluși, Cereale bebeluși

en: From 4 months
ca: Des dels 4 mesos
de: Ab 4. Monat, Ab dem 4. Monat
es: De 4 meses, A partir de 4 meses
fi: 4 kk alkaen
fr: Dès 4 mois, Dès 04 mois
hr: Od 4 mjeseca
hu: 4 hónapos kortól
it: Dal 4to mese, Dal quarto mese, A partire dal quarto mese, A partire dal 4to mese
lt: Nuo 4 mėnesių
nl: Vanaf 4 maanden, Vanaf 4 maand
pt: A partir de 4 meses

en: From 6 months
ca: Des dels 6 mesos
de: Ab 6. Monat, Ab dem 6. Monat
es: De 6 meses, A partir de 6 meses
fi: Alkaen 6 kk
fr: Dès 6 mois, Dès 06 mois
hr: Od 6 mjeseci
hu: 6 hónapos kortól
it: Dal 6to mese, Dal sesto mese, A partire dal sesto mese, A partire dal 6to mese
lt: Nuo 6 mėnesių
nl: Vanaf 6 maanden, Vanaf 6 maand
pt: A partir dos 6 meses
ru: С 6 месяцев, Для детей от 6 месяцев

en: From 8 months
ca: Des dels 8 mesos
de: Ab 8. Monat, Ab dem 8. Monat
es: De 8 meses, A partir de 8 meses
fi: 8 kk alkaen
fr: Dès 8 mois, Dès 08 mois
hr: Od 8 mjeseci
hu: 8 hónapos kortól
it: Dall'8vo mese, Dall'ottavo mese, A partire dall'ottavo mese, A partire dall'8vo mese
lt: Nuo 8 mėnesių
nl: Vanaf 8 maanden, Vanaf 8 maand
pt: A partir de 8 meses
ru: С 8 месяцев, Для детей от 8 месяцев

en: From 10 months
ca: Des dels 10 mesos
de: Ab 10. Monat, Ab dem 10. Monat
es: De 10 meses, A partir de 10 meses
fi: 10 kk alkaen
fr: Dès 10 mois
hr: Od 10 mjeseci
hu: 10 hónapos kortól
it: Dal 10mo mese, Dal decimo mese, A partire dal decimo mese, A partire dal 10mo mese
lt: Nuo 10 mėnesių
nl: Vanaf 10 maanden, Vanaf 10 maand
pt: A partir de 10 meses

en: From 12 months old, from 1 year of age
ca: Des dels 12 mesos
de: Ab 12. Monat, Ab dem 12. Monat, Ab 1 Jahr
es: De 12 meses, A partir de 12 meses, De 1 año, A partir de 1 año
fi: 12 kk alkaen
fr: Dès 12 mois, dès 1 an, dès un an
hr: Od 12 mjeseci
hu: 12 hónapos kortól, 1 éves kortól, Egy éves kortól
it: Dal 12mo mese, Dal dodicesimo mese, A partire dal dodicesimo mese, A partire dal 12mo mese, A partire dal primo anno, Dal 1o anno
lt: Nuo 12 mėnesių, Nuo 1 metų
nl: Vanaf 12 maanden, Vanaf 12 maand
pt: A partir dos 12 meses, a partir de 1 ano